North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 3. Financial Support.

§ 115D-31.
State financial support of institutions.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall be responsible for providing, from sources available to the State Board, funds to meet the financial needs of institutions, as determined by policies and regulations of the State Board, for the following budget items:

Plant Fund. — Furniture and equipment for administrative and instructional purposes, library books, and other items of capital outlay approved by the State Board. Provided, the State Board may, on an equal matching-fund basis from appropriations made by the State for the purpose, grant funds to individual institutions for the purchase of land, construction and remodeling of institutional buildings determined by the State Board to be necessary for the instructional programs or administration of such institutions. For the purpose of determining amount of matching State funds, local funds shall include expenditures made prior to the enactment of this Chapter or prior to an institution becoming a community college pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, when such expenditures were made for the purchase of land, construction, and remodeling of institutional buildings subsequently determined by the State Board to be necessary as herein specified, and provided such local expenditures have not previously been used as the basis for obtaining matching State funds under the provisions of this Chapter or any other laws of the State. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, G.S. 116-53(b), or

G.S. 143C-4-5

, appropriations by the State of North Carolina for capital or permanent improvements for community colleges may be matched with any prior expenditure of non-State funds for capital construction or land acquisition not already used for matching purposes.

Current Operating Expenses:

General administration. — Salaries and other costs as determined by the State Board necessary to carry out the functions of general administration.

Instructional services. — Salaries and other costs as determined by the State Board necessary to carry out the functions of instructional services.

Support services. — Salaries and other costs as determined by the State Board necessary to carry out the functions of support services.

Additional Support for Regional Institutions as Defined in

G.S. 115D-2(4)

. — Matching funds to be used with local funds to meet the financial needs of the regional institutions for the items set out in G.S. 115D-32(a)(2)a. Amount of matching funds to be provided by the State under this section shall be determined as follows: The population of the administrative area in which the regional institution is located shall be called the “local factor,” the combined populations of all other counties served by the institution shall be called the “State factor.” When the budget for the items listed in G.S. 115D-32(a)(2)a has been approved under the procedures set out in

G.S. 115D-45

, the administrative area in which the regional institution is located shall provide a percentage to be determined by dividing the local factor by the sum of the local factor and the State factor. The State shall provide a percentage of the necessary funds to meet this budget, the percentage to be determined by dividing the State factor by the sum of the local factor and the State factor. If the local administrative area provides less than its proportionate share, the amount of State funds provided shall be reduced by the same proportion as were the administrative area funds.Wherever the word “population” is used in this subdivision, it shall mean the population of the particular area in accordance with the latest United States census.

The State Board is authorized to accept, receive, use, or reallocate to the institutions any federal funds or aids that have been or may be appropriated by the government of the United States for the encouragement and improvement of any phase of the programs of the institutions.

(b1)

A local community college may use all State funds allocated to it, except for Literacy funds and Customized Training funds, for any authorized purpose that is consistent with the college’s Institutional Effectiveness Plan. The State Board of Community Colleges may authorize a local community college to use up to twenty percent (20%) of the State Literacy funds allocated to it to provide employability skills, job-specific occupational and technical skills, and developmental education instruction to students concurrently enrolled in an eligible community college literacy course.Each local community college shall include in its Institutional Effectiveness Plan a section on how funding flexibility allows the college to meet the demands of the local community and to maintain a presence in all previously funded categorical programs.

State funds appropriated to the State Board of Community Colleges for equipment and library books, except for funds appropriated to the Equipment Reserve Fund, shall revert to the General Fund 12 months after the close of the fiscal year for which they were appropriated. Encumbered balances outstanding at the end of each period shall be handled in accordance with existing State budget policies. The System Office shall identify to the Office of State Budget and Management the funds that revert at the end of the 12 months after the close of the fiscal year.

State funds appropriated to the State Board of Community Colleges for the Equipment Reserve Fund shall be allocated to institutions in accordance with the equipment allocation formula for the fiscal period. An institution to which these funds are allocated shall spend the funds only in accordance with an equipment acquisition plan developed by the institution and approved by the State Board.These funds shall not revert and shall remain available until expended in accordance with an approved plan.

If receipts for community college tuition and fees exceed the amount certified in General Fund Codes at the end of a fiscal year, the State Board of Community Colleges shall transfer the amount of receipts and fees above those budgeted to the Enrollment Growth Reserve. Funds in the Enrollment Growth Reserve shall not revert to the General Fund and shall remain available to the State Board until expended. The State Board may allocate funds in this reserve to colleges experiencing an enrollment increase greater than five percent (5%) of budgeted enrollment levels.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1973, c. 590, ss. 2, 3; c. 637, s. 1; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; c. 946, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1981, c. 157, s. 2; 1985, c. 757, s. 146; 1987, c. 564, ss. 9, 12; 1995, c. 324, s. 16; 1998-212, s. 10.2(a); 1999-84, s. 11; 1999-237, s. 9.3(a); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2006-203, s. 38; 2010-31, s. 8.2; 2011-145, s. 8.4; 2015-241, s. 10.2(b).

Local Modification.

(As to subsection (b1)) Stanly Community College: 2017-57, s. 9.15(a).

Cross References.

As to budgeting, accounting and fiscal management, see

G.S. 115D-54

et seq.

As to match requirements applicable to bond proceeds for new construction, exceptions, and provisions for allocation where a community college has failed to meet matching requirements by July 1, 2006, see the editor’s note at

G.S. 116D-41

.

§ 115D-31.1.
Liability insurance.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 115D-32(a)(2)b2 and any other provision of the law to the contrary, boards of trustees of all institutions in this Chapter may use State funds to pay the lawful premiums of liability insurance as provided in this section.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 105.

§ 115D-31.2.
Maintenance of plant.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, any community college that has an out-of-county student head count served on the main campus of the college in excess of fifty percent (50%) of the total student head count as defined by the State Board of Community Colleges, shall be provided funds for the purpose of “operations of plant”. Each college that qualifies for these funds shall receive a pro rata amount of the funds that are appropriated for this purpose.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 110; 2001-424, s. 30.13.

§ 115D-31.3.
Institutional performance accountability.

Implementation of Accountability Measures and Performance Standards. — The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt and implement a system of accountability measures and performance standards for the Community College System. At least once every three years, the State Board of Community Colleges shall review, and revise if necessary, the accountability measures and performance standards to ensure that they are appropriate for use in recognition of successful institutional performance. If the State Board determines that accountability measures and performance standards must be revised following a review required by this subsection, the State Board shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee prior to the implementation of any proposed revisions.

through (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2000-67, s. 9.7, effective July 1, 2000.

(e)

Mandatory Performance Measures. —

The State Board of Community Colleges shall evaluate each college on the following performance measures:

Progress of basic skills students.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 10.1, effective July 1, 2016.

Performance of students who transfer to a four-year institution.

(3a)

Success rate of students in credit-bearing English courses.

(3b)

Success rate of students in credit-bearing Math courses.

, (5) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 10.1, effective July 1, 2016.

(5a)

Progress of first-year curriculum students.

(6)

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 8.5, effective July 1, 2012.

(7)

Curriculum student retention and graduation.

(8)

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 8.5, effective July 1, 2012.

(9)

Attainment of licensure and certifications by students.

The State Board may also evaluate each college on additional performance measures.

(f)

Publication of Performance Ratings. —

Each college shall publish its performance on the measures set out in subsection (e) of this section (i) annually in its electronic catalog or on the Internet and (ii) in its printed catalog each time the catalog is reprinted.The Community Colleges System Office shall publish the performance of all colleges on all measures.

(g)

Recognition of Successful Institutional Performance. —

For the purpose of recognition of successful institutional performance, the State Board of Community Colleges shall evaluate each college on the performance measures set out in subsection (e) of this section. Subject to the availability of funds, the State Board may allocate funds among colleges based on the evaluation of each institution’s performance, including at least the following components:

(1)

Program quality evaluated by determining a college’s rate of student success on each measure as compared to a systemwide performance baseline and goal.

(2)

Program impact on student outcomes evaluated by the number of students succeeding on each measure.A college may use funds allocated to it pursuant to this subsection for one-time, performance-based bonuses for faculty and staff. Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), a bonus awarded with funds pursuant to this subsection is not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes.

(g1)

Carryforward of Funds Allocated Based on Performance. —

A college that receives funds under subsection (g) of this section may retain and carry forward an amount up to or equal to its performance-based funding allocation for that year into the next fiscal year.

(h)

through (j) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 10.5(a), effective July 1, 2013.

History.

1999-237, s. 9.2(a); 2000-67, s. 9.7; 2001-186, s. 1; 2006-66, s. 8.9(a); 2007-230, s. 1; 2007-484, s. 29.5(a); 2007-527, s. 19; 2012-142, s. 8.5; 2013-360, s. 10.5(a); 2014-115, s. 28(f); 2016-94, s. 10.1; 2018-5, s. 9.8.

§ 115D-32.
Local financial support of institutions.

The tax-levying authority of each institution shall be responsible for providing, in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 115D-33

or 115D-34, as appropriate, adequate funds to meet the financial needs of the institutions for the following budget items:

Plant Fund: Acquisition of land; erection of all buildings; alterations and additions to buildings; purchase of automobiles, buses, trucks, and other motor vehicles; purchase or rental of all equipment necessary for the maintenance of buildings and grounds and operation of plants; and purchase of all furniture and equipment not provided for administrative and instructional purposes.

Current expenses:

Plant operation and maintenance:

Salaries of janitors, maids, watchmen, maintenance and repair employees.

Cost of fuel, water, power, and telephone services.

Cost of janitorial supplies and materials.

Cost of operation of motor vehicles.

Cost of maintenance and repairs of buildings and grounds.

Maintenance and replacement of furniture and equipment provided from local funds.

Maintenance of plant heating, electrical, and plumbing equipment.

Maintenance of all other equipment, including motor vehicles, provided by local funds.

Rental of land and buildings.

Any other expenses necessary for plant operation and maintenance.

Support services:

Cost of insurance for buildings, contents, motor vehicles, workers’ compensation for institutional employees paid from local funds, and other necessary insurance.

Any tort claims awarded against the institution due to the negligence of the institutional employees.

Cost of bonding institutional employees for the protection of local funds and property.

Cost of elections held in accordance with

G.S. 115D-33

and 115D-35.

Legal fees incurred in connection with local administration and operation of the institution.

The board of trustees of each institution may apply local public funds provided in accordance with G.S. 115D-33(a), as appropriate, or private funds, or both, to the supplementation of items of the current expense budget financed from State funds, provided a budget is submitted in accordance with

G.S. 115D-54

.

The board of trustees of each institution may apply institutional funds provided in accordance with G.S. 115D-54(b)(3) for such purposes as may be determined by the board of trustees of the institution.

The counties that agree to have satellite campuses of community colleges located in them accept the maintenance and utility costs of these satellite campuses.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1981, c. 157, s. 3; 1985, c. 757, s. 148(a); 1987, c. 564, s. 11; 1995, c. 509, s. 64; 1999-84, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to budgeting, accounting and fiscal management, see

G.S. 115D-54

et seq.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The adequacy of the funds provided to a community college pursuant to statute should be determined by the degree to which these funds meet the financial needs of that college for the budget items identified in the statute, which is necessarily a fact-intensive inquiry. See opinion of Attorney General to Dr. Ted H. Gasper, Jr., President, Halifax Community College, 2000 N.C. AG LEXIS 26 (6/14/2000).

§ 115D-33.
Providing local public funds for institutions established under this Chapter; elections.

Except as provided in

G.S. 115D-34

, the tax-levying authority of an institution may provide for local financial support of the institution as follows:

By appropriations from nontax revenues in a manner consistent with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act, provided the continuing authority to make such appropriations shall have been approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the administrative area who shall vote on the question in an election held for such purpose, or

By a special annual levy of taxes within a maximum annual rate which maximum rate shall have been approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the administrative area who shall vote on the question of establishing or increasing the maximum annual rate in an election held for such purpose or both, and

By issuance of bonds, in the case of capital outlay funds, provided that each issuance of bonds shall be approved by a majority of the qualified voters of each county of the administrative area who shall vote on the question in an election held for that purpose. All bonds shall be subject to the Local Government Finance Act (Chapter 159) and shall be issued pursuant to Subchapter IV, Long-Term Financing, (§ 159-43 et seq.) of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

At the election on the question of approving authority of the board of commissioners of each county in an administrative area (the tax-levying authority) to appropriate funds from nontax revenues or a special annual levy of taxes or both, the ballot furnished the qualified voters in each county may be worded substantially as follows: “For the authority of the board of commissioners to appropriate funds either from nontax revenues or from a special annual levy of taxes not to exceed an annual rate of _______________ cents per one hundred dollars ($100.00) of assessed property valuation, or both, for the financial support of _______________ (name of the institution)” plus any other pertinent information and “Against the authority of the board of commissioners, etc.,” with a square before each proposition, in which the voter may make a cross mark (X), but any other form of ballot containing adequate information and properly stating the question to be voted upon shall be construed as being in compliance with this section.

The question of approving authority to appropriate funds, to levy special taxes and the question of approving an issue of bonds, when approval of each or both shall be necessary for the establishment or conversion of an institution, shall be submitted at the same election.

All elections shall be held in the same manner as elections held under Article 4, Chapter 159, of the General Statutes, the Local Government Bond Act, and shall be held on a date permitted by

G.S. 163-287

.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall ascertain that authority to provide adequate funds for the establishment and operation of an institution has been approved by the voters of a proposed administrative area before favorably recommending approval of the establishment of an institution.

Notwithstanding any present provisions of this Chapter, the tax-levying authority of each institution may at its discretion and upon its own motion provide by appropriations of nontax revenue, tax revenue, or both, funds for the support of institutional purposes as set forth in

G.S. 115D-32

; but nothing herein shall be construed to authorize the issuance of bonds without a vote of the people.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1971, c. 402; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1983, c. 717, s. 27.3; 2013-381, s. 10.18; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “G.S. 163A-1592” for “G.S. 163-287” in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 10.18, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “shall be held on a date permitted by

G.S. 163-287

” for “may be held at any time fixed by the tax-levying authority of the administrative area or proposed administrative area of the institution for which such election is to be held” in subsection (d). For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 115D-34.
Providing local public funds for institutions previously established.

For counties in which, immediately prior to the enactment of this Chapter, there was in operation or authorized a public community college or industrial education center which hereafter shall be operated pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, the following provisions shall apply in providing local financial support for each such institution:

Community colleges: The board of commissioners of a county in which is located a public community college heretofore operated or authorized to operate pursuant to Article 3, Chapter 116, of the General Statutes of North Carolina, may continue to levy special taxes annually for the local financial support of the institution as a community college as provided in

G.S. 115D-32

, to the maximum rate last approved by the voters of the county in accordance with the above Article. The board of commissioners may also provide all or part of such funds by appropriations, in a manner consistent with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act, from nontax revenues. The question of increasing the maximum annual rate of a special tax may be submitted at an election held in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 115D-33(d) and the appropriate provisions of

G.S. 115D-35

.

Industrial education centers: The board of commissioners of a county in which is located an industrial education center heretofore operated or authorized to operate as part of the public school system and which hereafter shall be operated as a community college as defined in this Chapter may levy special taxes annually at a rate sufficient to provide funds for the financial support of the institute or college as required by

G.S. 115D-32

(a). The board of commissioners may also provide all or part of such funds by appropriations, in a manner consistent with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act, from nontax revenues. The board of commissioners is authorized to provide additional funds, either by special tax levies or by appropriations from nontax revenues, or both, to an amount equal to that required to be provided above, for the purpose of supplementing the current expense budget of the institute or college financed from State funds.

The board of commissioners of a county in which is located one of the above public community colleges or industrial education centers may provide funds for capital outlay for such institution by the issuance of bonds. All bonds shall be issued in accordance with the appropriate provisions of

G.S. 115D-33

and 115D-35.

Public funds provided a community college or industrial education center prior to its becoming subject to the provisions of this Chapter and which remain to the credit of the institution upon its becoming subject to these provisions shall be expended only for the purposes prescribed by law when such funds were provided the institution.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1965, c. 842, s. 1; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1987, c. 564, ss. 20, 34.

§ 115D-35.
Requests for elections to provide funds for institutions.

Formal requests for elections on the question of authority to appropriate nontax revenues or levy special taxes, or both, and to issue bonds, when such elections are to be held for the purpose of establishing an institution, shall be originated and submitted only in the following manner:

Proposed multiple-county administrative areas: Formal requests for elections may be submitted jointly by all county boards of education in the proposed administrative area, or by petition of fifteen percent (15%) of the number of qualified voters of the proposed area who voted in the last preceding election for Governor, to the boards of commissioners of all counties in the proposed area, who shall fix the time for such election by joint resolution on a date permitted by

G.S. 163-287

, which shall be entered in the minutes of each board.

Proposed single-county administrative area: Formal requests shall be submitted by the board of education of any public school administrative unit within the county of the proposed administrative area or by petition of fifteen percent (15%) of the number of qualified voters of the county who voted in the last preceding election for Governor, to the board of commissioners of the county of the proposed administrative area, who shall fix the time for such election by resolution on a date permitted by

G.S. 163-287

, which shall be entered in the minutes of the board.

Formal requests for elections on any of the questions specified in (a) above, or on the question of increasing the maximum annual rate of special taxes for the financial support of an institution with a properly established board of trustees, may be submitted to the tax-levying authority only by such board of trustees.

All formal requests for elections regarding the levy of special taxes shall state the maximum annual rate for which approval is to be sought in an election.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny or limit the power of the tax-levying authority of an institution to hold elections, of its own motion, on any or all the questions provided in this section, subject to the provisions of this Article.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 2013-381, s. 10.19; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “G.S. 163A-1592” for “G.S. 163-287” in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 10.19, effective January 1, 2014, in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2), substituted “shall fix” for “may fix” and inserted “on a date permitted by

G.S. 163-287

.” For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 115D-36.
Elections on question of the addition of a college transfer program at an institution and issuance of bonds therefor.

Whenever the board of trustees of an institution requests the State Board of Community Colleges to authorize the addition of a college transfer program, the Board shall require, as a prerequisite to such addition:

The authorization by the voters of the administrative area of an annual levy of taxes within a specified maximum annual rate sufficient to provide the required local financial support for the institution after the addition of the college transfer program, in an election held in accordance with the appropriate provisions of

G.S. 115D-33

and 115D-35.

The approval by the voters of the administrative area of the issuance of bonds for capital outlay necessary for the institution after the addition of the college transfer program, in an election held in accordance with the appropriate provisions of

G.S. 115D-33

and 115D-35.

History.

1968, c. 443, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1987, c. 564, s. 5.

§ 115D-37.
Payment of expenses of special elections under Chapter.

The cost of special elections held under the authority of this Chapter in connection with the establishment of an institution shall be paid out of the general fund of the county or counties which shall conduct such elections. All special elections held on behalf of a duly established institution shall be paid by such institution and the expenses may be included in the annual institutional budgets.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2.

§ 115D-38.
Authority to issue bonds and notes, to levy taxes and to appropriate nontax revenues.

Counties are authorized to issue bonds and notes and to levy special taxes to meet payments of principal and interest on such bonds or notes and to levy special taxes for the special purpose of providing local financial support of an institution and otherwise to appropriate nontax revenues for the financial support of an institution, in the manner and for the purposes provided in this Chapter.

Taxes authorized by this section are declared to be for a special purpose and may be levied notwithstanding any constitutional limitation or limitations imposed by any general or special law.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2.

§ 115D-39.
Student tuition and fees.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall fix and regulate all tuition and fees charged to students for applying to or attending any institution pursuant to this Chapter.The receipts from all student tuition and fees, other than student activity fees, shall be State funds and shall be deposited as provided by regulations of the State Board of Community Colleges.The legal resident limitation with respect to tuition, set forth in

G.S. 116-143.1

and

G.S. 116-143.3

, shall apply to students attending institutions operating pursuant to this Chapter; provided, however, that when an employer other than the Armed Forces, as that term is defined in

G.S. 116-143.3

, pays tuition for an employee to attend an institution operating pursuant to this Chapter and when the employee works at a North Carolina business location, the employer shall be charged the in-State tuition rate; provided further, however, a community college may charge in-State tuition to up to one percent (1%) of its out-of-state students, rounded up to the next whole number, to accommodate the families transferred by business, the families transferred by industry, or the civilian families transferred by the Armed Forces, consistent with the provisions of G.S. 116-143.3, into the State. Notwithstanding these requirements, a refugee who lawfully entered the United States and who is living in this State shall be deemed to qualify as a domiciliary of this State under

G.S. 116-143.1

(a)(1) and as a State resident for community college tuition purposes as defined in G.S. 116-143.1(a)(2). Also, a nonresident of the United States who has resided in North Carolina for a 12-month qualifying period and has filed an immigrant petition with the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service shall be considered a State resident for community college tuition purposes.

(a1)

In addition, federal law enforcement officers, firefighters, EMS personnel, and rescue and lifesaving personnel whose permanent duty station is within North Carolina and who do not otherwise qualify for tuition waivers under G.S. 115D-5(b)(2a) shall also be eligible for the State resident community college tuition rate for courses that support their organizations’ training needs and are approved for this purpose by the State Board of Community Colleges.

In addition, any person lawfully admitted to the United States who satisfied the qualifications for assignment to a public school set out under

G.S. 115C-366

and graduated from the public school to which the student was assigned shall also be eligible for the State resident community college tuition rate. This subsection does not make a person a resident of North Carolina for any other purpose.

In addition, a person sponsored under this subsection who is lawfully admitted to the United States is eligible for the State resident community college tuition rate. For purposes of this subsection, a North Carolina nonprofit entity is a charitable or religious corporation as defined in

G.S. 55A-1-40

that is incorporated in North Carolina and that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a civic league incorporated in North Carolina under Chapter 55A of the General Statutes that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code. A nonresident of the United States is sponsored by a North Carolina nonprofit entity if the student resides in North Carolina while attending the community college and the North Carolina nonprofit entity provides a signed affidavit to the community college verifying that the entity accepts financial responsibility for the student’s tuition and any other required educational fees. Any North Carolina nonprofit entity that sponsors a nonresident of the United States under this subsection may sponsor no more than five nonresident students annually under this subsection. This subsection does not make a person a resident of North Carolina for any other purpose.

A community college may add the cost of textbooks purchased at the college’s bookstore to the tuition rates established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for all purposes associated with billing the armed services for the enrollment of members of the armed services, as defined in

G.S. 116-143.3

, if the student’s branch of the armed services permits the addition of textbooks to tuition costs in its tuition assistance program. The college may retain the funds attributable to the cost of the textbooks.

A United States citizen shall be eligible to receive the State resident community college tuition rate for the school year immediately following the student’s graduation from high school if all of the following conditions are met:

The individual satisfied the qualifications for assignment to a public school, as provided in

G.S. 115C-366

.

The individual was enrolled in a North Carolina public school unit for the entirety of the final school year before receiving a high school diploma from the public school unit.

The individual was unable, due to lack of evidence, to establish residency for tuition purposes through the centralized residency determination process administered by the State Education Assistance Authority.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1981, c. 157, s. 4; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 58; 1989, c. 752, s. 85; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 25(a); 1993, c. 561, s. 50(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 17.1(a); 2000-67, s. 9.8; 2003-284, ss. 8.16(b), 8.16A(a); 2010-31, s. 8.4(b); 2011-145, s. 8.12(d); 2011-183, s. 80; 2011-184, s. 1; 2016-94, s. 10.4(b); 2021-133, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to contracts by minors borrowing for higher education at junior colleges and industrial education centers, see

G.S. 116-174.1

.

§ 115D-39.1.
Tuition surcharge.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 115D-39(a)

, a community college may, with the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges:

Implement a tuition surcharge of up to thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the statewide tuition rate to fund a new instructional program that is necessary to attract industry to the area, and

Use the proceeds of an endowed scholarship, consistent with the terms of the endowment, to offset the cost of the tuition charge.

All students enrolled in the new program, except for students for whom tuition and registration are waived by law or regulation, shall be charged the tuition surcharge. The funds collected from the endowment shall be deposited into an unrestricted institutional fund account at the community college.

This section applies only to an endowed scholarship in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000).

The State Board shall adopt rules to implement this section.

History.

2007-367, s. 1; 2015-264, s. 64.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 64, effective October 1, 2015, substituted “G.S. 115D-39(a)” for “G.S. 115D-39.1(a)” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a).

§ 115D-40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-237, s. 9.4(c), effective July 1, 1999.